Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5498.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Agency" means a department of this state. (b) "Permit" means any agency permit, license, certificate, approval, registration, or similar form of permission required by law or agency rule. Sec. 3. (1) If an agency issues permits under state law or rule, the agency must do both of the following: (a) Separate the permits into subject areas based on the industry that the permits regulate. (b) For each subject area, assign an employee to manage the issuance of permits for that subject area. (2) The subject area that the agency assigns to an employee under subsection (1) is the employee's primary subject area. However, an employee may assist another employee in issuing Â permits for a subject area that is not the employee's primary subject area. (3) An agency shall not hire any additional full-time equivalent employees to manage the issuance of permits or assist in the issuance of permits.